Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1325
Real property; power of department to sell and convey excess.

The department shall have the authority to sell and convey, with the approval of the Governor, any part of or any interest in real property held by the department which is no longer deemed necessary or desirable for highway purposes. The sale or conveyance of such real property shall be in such manner as will best serve the interests of the state and will most adequately conserve highway funds.

Laws 1955, c. 148, § 25, p. 428.